Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska64-212
Acknowledgment of written instrument; insurance company; credit union; oath; authorized.

It shall be lawful for a member or shareholder, an appointive officer, elective officer, agent, director, or employee of an insurance company or a credit union who is a notary public to take the acknowledgment of any person to any written instrument executed to or by the insurance company or credit union and to administer an oath to any shareholder, director, elected or appointed officer, employee, or agent of such insurance company or credit union.

Laws 1947, c. 247, § 1, p. 771;

Laws 1949, c. 221, § 1, p. 622;

Laws 1951, c. 253, § 1, p. 873;

Laws 1957, c. 315, § 2, p. 1133;

R.R.S.1943, § 76-217.02;

Laws 1976, LB 622, § 3;

Laws 1976, LB 704, § 1;

Laws 2002, LB 1094, § 15.